West Virginia, session 2025, SB888.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: Article 53. Establishing Additional Substance Abuse Treatment Facilities. §16-53-4. Progression of treatment for substance use disorder. (a) When someone is first entering drug treatment, they are in the initiation phase and must provide a comprehensive test. After this, and continuing for six weeks, a qualitative test must be done every two weeks for six weeks.(b) Next, the patient moves into the stabilization phase and must undergo a qualitative test every 45 days for one year.(c) Following this, the patient moves into the maintenance phase and must undergo a qualitative test every six months thereafter.(d) At any point the provider wants to assess compliance, the patient must be willing to produce a qualitative or quantitative test upon the provider request.